Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6903
Additional definitions.

Any term has the same meaning as used in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 3.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.